District of Columbia statutes.
16-2921

Repealed

Appointment of commissioners; cases of partition.

Repealed.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 597, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 561, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(k)(1)
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81,§ 10(mm), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 803(c)(3), 48 DCR 2087
1981 Ed., § 16-2921.
1973 Ed., § 16-2921.